South Dakota, session 2026, SB58.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 4-7:
The Bureau of Finance and Management shall recommend to the Joint Committee
on Appropriations an amount to be appropriated each year to be transferred to political
subdivisions of this state for their necessary expenditures.
Section 2. That § 7-25-1 be AMENDED:
7-25-1. The board of county commissioners may levy a tax not to exceed ninety
zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation to be used or paid into a fund for the
purpose of acquiring a site, constructing, renovating, improving, remodeling, altering,
adding to, repairing, erecting, or maintaining a courthouse, office, jail building, county
exhibition buildings building, 4-H and extension buildings, grandstands building,
grandstand and bleachers, highway maintenance buildings building, or public library. The
county may cooperate in a joint undertaking for any of the foregoing purposes with any
other county, municipality or school district. The levy authorized by this section is in
addition to the levy authorized in § 10-12-21. The proceeds of the levy authorized by this
section may be pledged by the county to payments under an agreement entered into
pursuant to § 7-25-19 without regard to the limitations of § 7-25-3.
Section 3. That § 7-27-1 be AMENDED:
7-27-1. The county commissioners may erect, maintain, repair, remodel, and
otherwise improve upon any ground owned or acquired by purchase, including by contract
for deed or lease with purchase option, lease, gift, bequest, or otherwise, any building to
be used for the exhibition of stock, farm produce, school work, and domestic arts, or for
the sale of livestock, or for farmers' or other meetings or any other purpose which in the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 2 58
discretion of the county commissioners is to the benefit of the best interests of the county.
The board may purchase, including by contract for deed or lease with purchase option,
lease, or otherwise acquire by gift, bequest, or otherwise, any other real property in the
county with or without buildings thereon, or lease space in any building within the county,
for any of the above specified above-specified purposes. The county commissioners may
levy a tax for any of the these purposes not to exceed thirty zero cents per thousand
dollars of taxable valuation of taxable property in the county. The levy authorized by this
section is in addition to the levy authorized in § 10-12-21.
Section 4. That § 10-12-13 be AMENDED:
10-12-13. The board of county commissioners may levy an annual tax, not
exceeding zero dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, as a reserve fund to be
accumulated and used for the purpose of maintaining, repairing, constructing, and
reconstructing roads and bridges as follows:
(1) A levy not to exceed one dollar and twenty cents per thousand dollars of taxable
valuation, if the total taxable valuation of the county is one billion dollars or less;
(2) A levy not to exceed ninety cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, if
the total taxable valuation of the county is more than one billion dollars but less than two
billion dollars; and
(3) A levy not to exceed sixty cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, if
the total taxable valuation of the county is two billion dollars or more.
Money in the fund may be expended in the laying out, marking, maintaining,
constructing, and reconstructing roads and maintaining, constructing, and reconstructing
bridges, under the jurisdiction of the board of county commissioners. The tax levy shall
be is in addition to all other levies authorized to be made by the board of county
commissioners for road and bridge purposes provided for in § 10-12-21. The proceeds of
such the levy shall must be placed in a special fund to be known as the county highway
and bridge reserve fund. Any increased tax levy imposed pursuant to this section is
exempt from the provisions of chapter 10-13, if the county establishes the amount of
revenue payable from taxes on real property pursuant to § 10-12-13.1.
The total amount of revenue payable from any increased tax levy imposed pursuant
to this section may increase no more than the lesser of three percent or the index factor,
as defined in § 10-13-38, over the amount of revenue payable in the preceding year. After
applying the index factor, a county may increase the revenue payable from taxes on real
property above the limitations provided by this section by the percentage increase of value
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 3 58
resulting from any improvements or change in use of real property and any adjustments
in taxation of property separately classified and subject to statutory adjustments and
reductions under chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A, and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if
assessed the same as property of equal value.
Section 5. That § 10-12-21 be AMENDED:
10-12-21. The Except for a levy imposed pursuant to § 10-12-21.1, the total
annual county tax levy for all purposes may not exceed twelve zero dollars per thousand
dollars of taxable valuation.
Section 6. That § 10-12-21.1 be AMENDED:
10-12-21.1. A county may levy taxes in addition to the limit prescribed in § 10-
12-21 for the following purposes:
(1) Accumulation for all county buildings and structures pursuant to §§ 7-25-1, 7-
27-1, and 34-8-5;
(2) Accumulations for interest and principal payments on all county bonds,
long-term indebtedness, and judgments pursuant to §§ 7-18-7, 7-22-11, 7-24-18, and
41-18-6;
(3) For the highway and bridge reserve fund pursuant to § 10-12-13;
(4) For the snow removal and emergency disaster fund pursuant to § 34-5-2;
(5) For a railroad authority pursuant to § 49-17A-22;
(6) For regional airport authorities pursuant to § 50-6A-24;
(7) For secondary roads pursuant to § 31-12-27;
(8) For fire protection pursuant to § 34-31-3.
Section 7. That § 10-12-28 be AMENDED:
10-12-28. The Except for a levy imposed pursuant to § 10-12-27, the total rate
of the annual tax levy in civil townships may not exceed three zero dollars per thousand
dollars of taxable valuation.
Section 8. That § 10-12-28.1 be AMENDED:
10-12-28.1. If the allowable tax levy for a township in § 10-12-28 is insufficient
to meet other allowable expenses, fire protection expenses, and expenses for emergency
medical services, an additional annual tax for the purpose of providing fire protection and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 4 58
emergency medical services may be levied. However, the The additional levy may not
exceed one dollar and twenty cents zero dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation
within the township.
Section 9. That § 10-12-28.2 be AMENDED:
10-12-28.2. The voters of an organized civil township at the annual township
meeting may authorize an annual property tax levy not to exceed fifty zero cents per
thousand dollars of the taxable valuation of the township for the secondary road capital
improvement fund for projects and purposes as defined in § 31-13-3.1. The secondary
road capital improvement tax levy authorized by this section is in addition to the levies
authorized in §§ 10-12-28 and 31-13-22. Any tax levy imposed pursuant to this section
is exempt from the tax limitations imposed on a township pursuant to chapter 10-13.
Section 10. That § 10-12-32 be AMENDED:
10-12-32. In municipalities, the levy may not exceed twenty-seven zero dollars
per thousand dollars of taxable valuation.
Section 11. That § 10-12-42 be AMENDED:
10-12-42. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the
maximum levy for the general fund of a school district is as follows:
(1) The maximum tax levy is five dollars and twenty-one and one-tenth cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation, subject to the limitations on agricultural property
as provided in subdivision (2) of this section and owner-occupied property as provided in
subdivision (3) of this section;
(2) The maximum tax levy on agricultural property for the school district is one
dollar and twelve and five-tenths cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the
district's levies are less than the maximum levies as stated in this section, the levies must
maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical
relationship at the maximum levies; and
(3) The maximum tax levy for an owner-occupied single-family dwelling pursuant
to § 10-13-40 for the school district is two dollars and fifty-one and eight-tenths cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the district's levies are less than the maximum
levies as stated in this section, the levies must maintain the same proportion to each other
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 5 58
as represented in the mathematical relationship at the maximum levies zero dollars and
zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation.
All levies in this section must be imposed on valuations where the median level of
assessment represents eighty-five percent of market value as determined by the
Department of Revenue. These valuations must be used for all school funding purposes.
If the district has imposed an excess levy pursuant to § 10-12-43, the levies must
maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical
relationship at the maximum levies in this section. The school district may elect to tax at
less than the maximum amounts set forth in this section as effective for taxes payable in
2026.
Section 12. That § 13-13-72 be AMENDED:
13-13-72. It is the policy of the Legislature that the appropriation for state aid to
education increase on an annual basis increases annually by the percentage increase in
local need on an aggregate statewide basis so that the relative proportion of local need
paid by local effort and state aid shall remain constant. For school fiscal years 2017 to
2022, inclusive, the proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be
adjusted annually to maintain the proportion between state aid and local property taxes
and to reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the other revenue
base amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1.
Section 13. That § 13-13-72.1 be AMENDED:
13-13-72.1. Any adjustments in the levies specified in § 10-12-42 made pursuant
to §§ 13-13-71 and § 13-13-72 shall must be based on maintaining the relationship
between statewide local effort as a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year
succeeding the fiscal year in which the adjustment is made. For school fiscal years 2017
to 2022, inclusive, the proportion of local need paid by local effort and state aid shall be
adjusted annually to reflect adjustments in local effort due to the implementation of the
other revenue base amount as defined in § 13-13-10.1. However, if If the levies specified
in § 10-12-42 are not adjusted to maintain this relationship, the target teacher salary as
defined in § 13-13-10.1 shall must be reduced to maintain the relationship between
statewide local effort as a percentage of statewide local need.
Section 14. That § 13-13-92 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 6 58
13-13-92. The state general fund savings obtained through the state aid to
education formula from the difference between the school general fund levy for agriculture
property for taxes payable in 2018 pursuant to §§ 13-13-71, 13-13-72, and 13-13-72.1,
and the agriculture property levy adopted by legislative action for taxes payable in 2018,
are in place until July 1, 2040.
Section 15. That § 13-16-7 be AMENDED:
13-16-7. The schoolExcept to pay the principal and interest on indebtedness of
the district, the board of any school district of this state may at the board's discretion
authorize an annual levy of a tax not to exceed three zero dollars per thousand dollars of
taxable valuation on the taxable valuation of the district for the capital outlay fund for
assets as defined by § 13-16-6 or for the district's obligations under a resolution, lease-
purchase agreement, capital outlay certificate, or other arrangement with the Health and
Educational Facilities Authority. Taxes collected pursuant to the levy may be irrevocably
pledged by the school board to the payment of principal of and interest on installment
purchase contracts or capital outlay certificates entered into or issued pursuant to § 13-
16-6 or 13-16-6.2, or lease-purchase agreements or other arrangement with the Health
and Educational Facilities Authority and, so long as any capital outlay certificates are
outstanding, installment agreement payments, lease-purchase agreements, or other
arrangements are unpaid, the school board of any district may be compelled by mandamus
or other appropriate remedy to levy an annual tax sufficient to pay principal and interest
thereon, but not to exceed the three dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation in
any year authorized to be levied hereby.
The total amount of revenue payable from the levy provided in this section may
not increase annually by more than the lesser of three percent or the index factor, as
defined in § 10-13-38, over the maximum amount of revenue that could have been
generated from the taxes payable in 2016. Starting with taxes payable in 2021, the total
amount of revenue payable from the levy provided in this section may not increase
annually by more than three percent over the amount of revenue that could have been
raised in the prior year.
After applying three percent, a school district may increase the revenue payable
from taxes on real property above the limitations provided by this section by the
percentage increase of value resulting from any improvements or change in use of real
property, annexation, minor boundary changes, and any adjustments in taxation of real
property separately classified and subject to statutory adjustments and reductions under
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 7 58
chapters 10-4, 10-6, 10-6A, and 10-6B, except § 10-6-113, only if assessed the same as
property of equal value. For taxes payable in 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, and 2031, an
increase in revenue payable to a school district allowed under this paragraph may not
exceed three percent.
A school district may increase the revenue the district receives from taxes on real
property above the limit provided by this section for taxes levied to pay the principal,
interest, and redemption charges on any bonds issued after January 1, 2009, which are
subject to referendum, scheduled payment increases on bonds, for a levy directed by the
order of a court for the purpose of paying a judgment against the school district, upon the
termination of a tax increment financing district pursuant to § 11-9-46, or upon the
application of any discretionary formula to real property pursuant to § 10-6-137. Any
school district created or reorganized after January 1, 2016, is exempt from the limitation
provided by this section for a period of two years immediately following the district's
creation.
In no year may the annual tax levy provided in this section exceed three dollars
per thousand dollars of taxable valuation of the school district for the current year.
For purposes of this section, an increase in value resulting from an improvement
made to an owner-occupied single-family dwelling does not include additions to, or
improvements of, existing structures affixed to land that result in an increase in value of
forty percent or less to the owner-occupied single-family dwelling.
Section 16. That § 13-37-16 be AMENDED:
13-37-16. For taxes payable in 2026 2027, and each year thereafter, the school
board shall levy no more than one dollar and forty-six and two-tenths cents zero dollars
and zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, as a special levy in addition to
all other levies authorized by law for the amount so determined to be necessary, and the
levy must be spread against all of the taxable property of the district. The proceeds derived
from the levy constitute a school district special education fund of the district for the
payment of costs for the special education of all children in need of special education or
special education and related services who reside within the district pursuant to the
provisions of §§ 13-37-8.4 to 13-37-8.10, inclusive. The levy in this section is based on
valuations where the median level of assessment represents eighty-five percent of market
value as determined by the Department of Revenue. The total amount of taxes that would
be generated at the levy pursuant to this section is considered local effort. Money in the
special education fund may be expended for the purchase or lease of any assistive
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 8 58
technology that is directly related to special education and specified in a student's
individualized education plan. This section does not apply to real property improvements.
Section 17. That § 13-37-35.1 be AMENDED:
13-37-35.1. Terms used in chapter 13-37 mean:
(1) "Level one disability," a mild disability;
(2) "Level two disability," cognitive disability or emotional disorder;
(3) "Level three disability," hearing impairment, deafness, visual impairment, deaf-
blindness, orthopedic impairment, or traumatic brain injury;
(4) "Level four disability," autism;
(5) "Level five disability," multiple disabilities;
(5A) "Level six disability," prolonged assistance;
(6) "Index factor," is the annual percentage change in the consumer price index for
urban wage earners and clerical workers as computed by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics of the United States Department of Labor for the year before the year
immediately preceding the year of adjustment, or three percent, whichever is less;
(7) "Local effort," must be calculated for taxes payable in 2026 2027 and each year
thereafter using a the maximum special education levy of one dollar and twenty-
six and two-tenths cents per one thousand dollars of valuation set forth in § 13-
37-16;
(8) "Allocation for a student with a level one disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $7,650.45. For each school year thereafter, the allocation
for a student with a level one disability must be the previous fiscal year's allocation
for the child increased by the index factor;
(9) "Allocation for a student with a level two disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $16,759.91. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level two disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(10) "Allocation for a student with a level three disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $23,139.68. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level three disability must be the previous fiscal
year's allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(11) "Allocation for a student with a level four disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $18,053.89. For each school year thereafter, the
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 9 58
allocation for a student with a level four disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12) "Allocation for a student with a level five disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $37,039.28. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level five disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(12A) "Allocation for a student with a level six disability," for the school fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2025, is $11,838.15. For each school year thereafter, the
allocation for a student with a level six disability must be the previous fiscal year's
allocation for the child increased by the index factor;
(13) "Child count," is the number of students in need of special education or special
education and related services according to criteria set forth in rules promulgated
pursuant to §§ 13-37-1.1 and 13-37-46 submitted to the Department of Education;
(14) "Fall enrollment," the number of kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students
enrolled in all schools operated by the school district on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year minus the number of students for whom
the district receives tuition, except any nonresident student who is in the care and
custody of a state agency and is attending a public school and any student for
whom tuition is being paid pursuant to § 13-28-42.1, plus the number of students
for whom the district pays tuition;
(15) "Nonpublic school," a sectarian organization or entity accredited by the secretary of
education for the purpose of instructing children of compulsory school age. This
definition excludes any school that receives a majority of its revenues from public
funds;
(16) "Nonpublic fall enrollment," the number of children under age eighteen, who are
approved for alternative instruction pursuant to § 13-27-3 on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year plus:
(a) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of six hundred or more on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year, the number of kindergarten-
through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of September of
the previous regular school year in all nonpublic schools located within the
boundaries of the public school district;
(b) For nonpublic schools located within the boundaries of a public school
district with a fall enrollment of less than six hundred on the last Friday of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 10 58
September of the previous school year, the number of resident
kindergarten-through-twelfth-grade students enrolled on the last Friday of
September of the previous school year in all nonpublic schools located
within this state;
(17) "Special education fall enrollment," fall enrollment plus nonpublic fall enrollment;
(18) "Local need," an amount to be determined as follows:
(a) Multiply the special education fall enrollment by 0.1062 and multiply the
result by the allocation for a student with a level one disability;
(b) Multiply the number of students having a level two disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level two disability;
(c) Multiply the number of students having a level three disability as reported
on the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level three disability;
(d) Multiply the number of students having a level four disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level four disability;
(e) Multiply the number of students having a level five disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level five disability;
(f) Multiply the number of students having a level six disability as reported on
the child count for the previous school fiscal year by the allocation for a
student with a level six disability;
(g) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for extraordinary expenses defined in § 13-37-40;
(h) When calculating local need at the statewide level, include the amount set
aside for the South Dakota School for the Blind and Visually Impaired; and
(i) Sum the results of subdivisions (18)(a) to (h), inclusive; and
(19) "Effort factor," the school district's special education tax levy in dollars per thousand
divided by $1.262. The maximum effort factor is 1.0 zero and zero-tenths.
Section 18. That § 31-12A-23 be AMENDED:
31-12A-23. The board of trustees may cause the amount of any charges, and
interest and penalties on the charges, for road district service rendered or made available
to any land within and part of the district, which are due and unpaid on the first day of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 11 58
October in each year to be certified by the clerk of the district to the county auditor in the
manner provided in § 10-12-7 together with any taxes levied by the district for corporate
purposes. All amounts so certified shall must be inserted by the county auditor upon the
tax list of the current year and are payable and delinquent at the same time and shall
must incur penalty and interest and shall must be collected by the same procedure as real
estate taxes on the same property. In the event of a tax sale or the issuance of a tax
deed, the provisions of §§ 9-43-112 and 9-43-113 apply to all amounts so certified and
then delinquent, in the same manner as delinquent installments of special assessments.
Five percent of the eligible voters of the district may petition the board of trustees for
referendum of any special assessment or bond issue. A majority of the eligible voters of
the district who own the lots, tracts, or parcels of land subject to a special assessment or
bond issue by the road district is required for approval of the special assessment or bond
issue. For purposes of a referendum, if more than one person holds an interest in a lot,
tract, or parcel of land subject to a special assessment or bond issue, the vote for the lot,
tract, or parcel of land shall must be exercised as the owners may among themselves
determine and in no event may more than one vote be cast with respect to any one lot,
tract, or parcel of land in any referendum. The referendum shall must be governed, to the
extent applicable, by chapter 9-20. The referendum petition shall must be filed with the
clerk of the district within twenty days after the notice of the levy of the special assessment
or bond issue has been given the landowner.
The board of trustees may not levy any tax on real property, pursuant to this
section, except to pay the principal and interest payments on indebtedness of the district.
Section 19. That § 34-11A-20 be AMENDED:
34-11A-20. No Except to pay the principal and interest on indebtedness of the
district, no tax in excess of sixty zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation upon
the property within an ambulance district may be levied for such by the district pursuant
to the provisions of this chapter. The amount of money received from the tax levy on all
property within the district plus the amount of money received from the imposition of any
special assessment within the district may not exceed the amount which would be raised
by a general tax levy of sixty cents per thousand dollars upon all property within an
ambulance district.
In no case may the amount of tax levy exceed the amount of funds required to
defray the expenses of the district for a period of one year as embraced in the annual
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 12 58
estimate of expenses including the amount of principal and interest upon the indebtedness
of the district for the ensuing year.
However, no No district organized pursuant to this chapter is subject to any general
county levy for ambulance service.
Section 20. That § 31-12-27 be AMENDED:
31-12-27. Each board of county commissioners may levy annually a tax, not
exceeding zero dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation, upon the taxable
property within the county not included in any municipality, organized civil township,
improvement district organized pursuant to chapter 7-25A, or county road district
organized pursuant to chapter 31-12A, to carry out the provisions of § 31-12-26. If a
county levies a tax, the tax shall must be certified, become payable and delinquent, and,
if not paid, shall draw interest and penalty as other county taxes. The tax shall must be
used for such purposes provided in this section.
Section 21. That § 34-31-3 be AMENDED:
34-31-3. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of §§ 34-31-1 and 34-31-
2, the board of county commissioners may levy a tax not to exceed sixty zero cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation in the county outside the limits of any municipality
which that provides fire protection service. However, the The governing body of any
municipality may by ordinance petition the board of county commissioners to include the
taxable valuation within the limits of the municipality under the aforementioned levy for
county fire protection service. The inclusion of the taxable valuation within the limits of
the municipality under the levy for county fire protection service shall be is in addition to
the municipal levy for fire protection as provided in chapter 9-33. The proceeds of such
the tax shall must be used only for the purposes of §§ 34-31-1 and 34-31-2 in the county
in which the tax is levied and unexpended balances at the end of the fiscal year may not
revert to the general fund but shall must be permitted to accumulate and shall must be
available for carrying out the purposes of §§ 34-31-1 and 34-31-2. The levy authorized
by this section is in addition to the levy authorized in § 10-12-21.
Section 22. That § 34-31A-21 be AMENDED:
34-31A-21. The president and secretary shall certify the estimate provided by
§ 34-31A-20 to the proper county auditor or county auditors, on or before October first of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 13 58
each year. The Except to pay the principal and interest for any indebtedness of the district,
the auditor shall levy a tax not to exceed one dollar zero dollars per thousand dollars of
taxable valuation upon the taxable property within the district for the maintenance of the
fire protection district for the fiscal year as provided by law.
Section 23. That § 34-31A-22 be AMENDED:
34-31A-22. The rate of tax for functions authorized by this chapter may not
exceed sixty zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation in the rural fire district
for the purchase of rural fire-fighting equipment in rural fire districts or for the purpose of
assisting and contributing to the purchase and upkeep of fire-fighting equipment in
adjoining first or second class municipalities or villages.
Section 24. That § 46A-3E-1 be AMENDED:
46A-3E-1. A Except to pay the principal and interest for any indebtedness of the
district, a water development district board of directors may levy taxes, not to exceed
thirty zero cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation in the district, for the purposes
of chapters 46A-1, 46A-2, and 46A-3A to 46A-3E, inclusive. If an area is included in more
than one district, the tax levy payable to each of the water development districts is
determined by multiplying the greater of the overlapping water development districts'
levies by each water development district's taxing fraction. Each district's taxing fraction
is determined by dividing that district's proposed tax levy for the overlapped area by the
sum of all water development districts' levies for the overlapped area.
Section 25. That § 50-6A-24 be AMENDED:
50-6A-24. In counties or municipalities supporting airport authorities, a levy in
addition to all other levies permitted by law, not to exceed two dollars and forty cents zero
dollars per thousand dollars of taxable valuation of property in such county or municipality,
may be made for such purposes, but such county levy may not apply to any municipality
levying hereunder.
Section 26. That § 13-13-71 be REPEALED.
If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage
than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the
following year each of the levies specified in subdivision 13-13-10.1(13) shall be reduced
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.302.17 14 58
proportionally so that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate
basis equals the percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 27. That § 13-37-16.2 be REPEALED.
If local effort increases on a statewide aggregate basis by a greater percentage
than local need on a statewide aggregate basis from any one year to the next, for the
following year, the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) shall be reduced
proportionally so that the percentage increase in local effort on a statewide aggregate
basis equals the percentage increase in need on a statewide aggregate basis.
Section 28. That § 13-37-16.3 be REPEALED.
Any adjustments in the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) made pursuant
to § 13-37-16.2 shall be based on maintaining the relationship between statewide local
effort as a percentage of statewide local need in the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year
in which the adjustment is made. However, for fiscal year 2014, and each year thereafter,
if the levy specified in subdivision 13-37-35.1(7) is not adjusted to maintain this
relationship, the funding allocation for each disability level as defined in § 13-37-35.1 shall
be reduced proportionally to maintain the relationship between statewide local effort as a
percentage of statewide local need.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.